Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-926
County board; engineers; attorneys; employees; payment from drainage fund.

The county board may employ engineers, attorneys, and others to assist in the administration of sections 31-901 to 31-933. Payment for these services shall be made from the drainage fund except where a particular improvement project is set up, in which case the share of engineering, legal and other costs shall become part of the improvement project's costs and shall be paid therefrom.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 26, p. 492.